Hawaii, session 2025, SB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the school facilities authority was established to oversee the development, planning, and construction of public school facilities across the State of Hawaii, ensuring that schools meet the infrastructure needs of students, staff, and communities.  Currently, the school facilities authority board consists of five voting members appointed by the governor. The department of education is necessarily critical to the successful implementation of school facilities projects through its understanding of educational needs and administrative priorities.  There is a need to strengthen collaboration between the department of education and the school facilities authority to ensure that the planning and development of school facilities are aligned with the educational goals and requirements of Hawaii's public education system. The legislature further finds that the board of education, which oversees the department of education, brings a perspective on educational governance and policy.  Incorporating representatives from the department of education and board of education as ex officio nonvoting members of the school facilities authority board will ensure the department of education's strategic priorities are represented in the school facilities authority's projects and enhance the accountability and responsiveness of the school facilities authority to the needs of students, educators, and the community. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to add two ex officio voting members that represent the department of education and the board of education to the school facilities authority board. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-1704, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The board shall consist of [five] seven voting members[.  The] who shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties; provided that: (1)  Five of the members shall: [(1)] (A)  Be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34; [(2)] (B)  Have an interest in public school facilities; and [(3)] (C)  Include one member actively or previously engaged in the construction industry for at least five years; and [(4)  Serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties.] (2)  Two of the members shall be ex officio members, including: (A)  The superintendent of education or the superintendent's designee; and (B)  The chairperson of the board of education or the chairperson's designee." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.